Nebraska, session 109, LB504A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB504A LB504A
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $72,149 from the General
Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $147,752 from the General Fund for FY2026-27
to the Attorney General, for Program 507, to aid in carrying out the
provisions of Legislative Bill 504, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First
Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per
diems from funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $50,000
for FY2025-26 or $103,000 for FY2026-27.
-2-